Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-2110
Failure to maintain workers' compensation insurance; notice of revocation.

The commissioner shall issue a notice of revocation of registration to a contractor when an investigation reveals that the contractor no longer meets the conditions of registration set out in section 48-2105 by failure to maintain compliance with the laws of this state relating to workers' compensation insurance coverage. If the commissioner receives a notice of cancellation of workers' compensation insurance coverage, the commissioner shall revoke the registration as of the time of cancellation unless the contractor provides a new certification of insurance prior to the cancellation date.

Laws 1994, LB 248, § 14.